Rhode Island, session 2025, SB296.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-56-20.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-56 entitled
"Corrections Department" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-56-20.3. Community correctional program for women offenders.
(a) Program established. In addition to the provisions of § 42-56-20.2, there shall be
established within the department of corrections a community correctional program for women
offenders. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the department of corrections may
contract with private agencies to carry out the provisions of this section. The civil liability of these
agencies and their employees, acting within the scope of their employment, and carrying out the
provisions of this section, shall be limited in the same manner and dollar amount as if they were
agencies or employees of the state.
(b) Persons subject to this section. Every person who is either sentenced to imprisonment
in the women’s division of the adult correctional institutions for a term of two (2) years or less or
awaiting trial at the women’s division of the adult correctional institutions shall be eligible to serve
in the community confinement program for women offenders under the provisions of this section.
(c) Terms of community correctional program.
(1) The director, or the director’s designee, shall refer persons eligible to serve in the
community correctional program to the program director of the community correctional program.
The program director shall be responsible for developing with each person an individualized plan,
which shall be designed toward providing her an opportunity for rehabilitation and restitution. Each

plan shall assess the need for, and provide for, employment, vocational or academic education,
housing, restitution, community service, or any other social service or counseling need appropriate
to the particular woman. Each plan shall be submitted to the director of the department of
corrections, or the director’s designee, for approval.
(2) Upon approval by the director, or the director’s designee, of the plan, the plan shall be
submitted to the sentencing judge for the sentencing judge’s approval. Upon the court’s approval,
the person shall be released from the adult correctional institutions for participation in the
community correctional program. The supervision of persons so released shall be conducted by the
director, or the director’s designee. The director, or the director’s designee, shall have the full power
and authority set forth in § 42-56-20.2.
(d) Violations. Any person serving in the community correctional program who is found
to be a violator of any of the terms and conditions imposed upon her according to her plan, this
section or any rules, regulations, or restrictions issued pursuant hereto shall serve the balance of
her sentence in a classification deemed appropriate by the director.
(e) Costs.
(1) Assessment of additional penalty for prostitution-related offenses. There shall be
assessed as a penalty, in addition to those provided by law, against all defendants charged under §
11-34.1-1 et seq., who plead nolo contendere or guilty, or who are found guilty of the commission
of those crimes as follows:
(i) Where the offense charged is a felony, the assessment shall be in the amount of five
hundred dollars ($500), or ten percent (10%) of any fine imposed on the defendant by the court,
whichever is greater;
(ii) Where the offense charged is a misdemeanor, the assessment shall be in the amount of
three hundred and fifty dollars ($350), or ten percent (10%) of any fine imposed on the defendant
by the court, whichever is greater;
(iii) Costs shall be assessed whether or not the defendant is sentenced to prison.
(2) When there are multiple counts or multiple charges to be disposed of simultaneously,
the judge may, in the judge’s discretion, suspend the obligation of the defendant to pay on more
than three (3) counts or charges.
(3) The assessment shall be deposited as general revenues.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000995
========
LC000995 - Page 2 of 3